District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

21-1113

Restrictions on discharge; petition for discharge; causes for discharge; superintendent to be notified; notice of variation of order; denial on petition not a bar to another.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-137, § 604(a)(1), 25 DCR 5094

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 21-1113.